Alaska statutes. Title 9. Code of Civil Procedure.
Article 13. General Provisions.

Sec. 09.45.990.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“manufactured home” has the meaning given in AS

45.29.102

;

“real property” includes a manufactured home that has become real property under AS

34.85.010

.

History.

(§ 7 ch 64 SLA 2012)

Cross references. —

For a saving clause relating to interpretation of the provisions of ch. 64, SLA 2012, see § 31, ch. 64, SLA 2012 in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

For severability of the provisions of ch. 64, SLA 2012, see § 32, ch. 64, SLA 2012 in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.